Utah statutes.
70A-9a-331.    Priority of rights of purchasers of instruments, documents, and securities under other chapters -- Priority of interests in financial assets and security entitlements under Chapter 8, Uniform Commercial Code -- Investment Securities.

(1)  This chapter does not limit the rights of a holder in due course of a negotiable instrument, a holder to which a negotiable document of title has been duly negotiated, or a protected purchaser of a security.  These holders or purchasers take priority over an earlier security interest, even if perfected, to the extent provided in Chapters 3, Uniform Commercial Code - Negotiable Instruments, 7a, Uniform Commercial Code - Documents of Title, and 8, Uniform Commercial Code - Investment Securities.

(2)  This chapter does not limit the rights of or impose liability on a person to the extent that the person is protected against the assertion of a claim under Chapter 8, Uniform Commercial Code - Investment Securities.

(3)  Filing under this chapter does not constitute notice of a claim or defense to the holders, or purchasers, or persons described in Subsections (1) and (2).

